Idaho statutes. Title 42 IRRIGATION AND DRAINAGE — WATER RIGHTS AND RECLAMATION
Chapter 2 APPROPRIATION OF WATER — PERMITS, CERTIFICATES, AND LICENSES — SURVEY
§ 42-204. Examination — Permit — Commencement of work — Extensions — Appeal.

On receipt of the application, which shall be of a form prescribed by the department of water resources, it shall be the duty of that department to make an endorsement thereon of the date of its receipt and to examine said application and ascertain if it sets forth all the facts necessary to show the location, nature and amount of the proposed use. If upon such examination the application is found defective, it shall be the duty of the department of water resources to return the same for correction or to correspond with the applicant to obtain the needed information or amendments. If the application is returned to the applicant or the department shall request additional information and the applicant fails to return the corrected application or to supply the needed information within thirty (30) days, the department may void the record of said application and notify the applicant of such action. If the corrected application is returned or the information is supplied after thirty (30) days, such corrected application shall be treated in all respects as a new application, and the priority of the right initiated shall be determined by the date of receipt in the office of the department of the corrected application or additional information; provided, that upon request, and good cause appearing therefor, the director of the department of water resources may grant an extension of time within which to return the corrected application or supply needed information. All applications that comply with the provisions of this chapter and with the regulations of the department of water resources shall be numbered in such manner as will aid in their identification, and it shall be the duty of the department to approve all applications made in proper form that contemplate the application of water to a beneficial use: provided, that the department may deny any such application, or may partially approve and grant a permit for a lesser quantity of water than applied for, or may grant a permit upon conditions as provided in this chapter.

The department of water resources shall issue a permit for any approved application, make a record of the approval and provide a copy of the permit to the applicant, who shall be authorized, on receipt thereof, to proceed with the construction of the necessary works for the diversion of such water and to take all steps required to apply the water to a beneficial use and perfect the proposed appropriation.

The provisions of this subsection shall not apply to permits held by municipal providers for reasonably anticipated future needs. For all other permits, the department shall require that actual construction work and application of the water to full beneficial use shall be complete within a period of five (5) years from the date of such approval, but may limit permit development to a shorter period than requested in the application, and the permit shall set forth the date when beneficial application of the water to be diverted by such works shall be made. Sixty (60) days before the date set for the completion of the appropriation of water under any permit, the department shall forward a notice to the permit holder by certified mail at the permit holder’s address of record of the date for such completion, which said notice shall advise the permit holder of the necessity of submitting a statement of completion showing proof of beneficial use or a request for an extension of time on or before said date. The department may approve a timely request for an extension of time in the following circumstances:
(a) In cases where the permit holder is prevented from proceeding with construction, work, or application of water to full beneficial use by the permit holder’s failure to obtain necessary consent or final approval or rejection from the federal government because of the pendency of an application for right-of-way or other matter within the jurisdiction of the United States, by state, county, city or other local government permitting or administrative action or process related to the permit holder’s land or water development, or by litigation of any nature which might bring the permit holder’s title to said water in question, the department of water resources, upon proper showing of the existence of any such condition, and being convinced that said permit holder is proceeding diligently and in good faith, shall extend the time so that the amount of time lost by such delays shall be added to the time given in the original permit, or in any subsequent grant of extension pursuant to paragraph (b), (c), (d), or (f) of this subsection, for each and every action required.

For permits held by municipal providers for reasonably anticipated future needs, the permit development period shall correspond to the planning horizon authorized by the permit, which may not be extended. During the permit development period, the municipal provider shall periodically submit to the department incremental statements of completion showing proof of beneficial use consistent with the provisions of section 42-217, Idaho Code. Each such incremental statement shall document the extent of application of water to beneficial use during the most recent reporting interval. Each incremental statement shall be prepared by a certified water rights examiner, unless the permit holder is not asserting any additional increment of beneficial use during that reporting interval. The department shall set and may later adjust the duration of any reporting interval for any permit, which shall be made a condition of the permit, to any duration not shorter than five (5) years. Sixty (60) days before the end of each reporting interval, the department shall forward a notice to the municipal provider by certified mail to its address of record specifying the date the incremental statement is due. Unless an extension of the deadline for the incremental statement is requested by the municipal provider prior to the deadline, and the extension is approved by the director upon a showing of good cause, failure to timely submit an incremental statement shall result in a lapse of that portion of the permit that has not previously been licensed or for which an incremental statement of completion showing proof of beneficial use has not been submitted. Such lapsed permit portion may be reinstated only in accordance with the provisions of section 42-218a, Idaho Code. For reasonably anticipated future needs permits existing on July 1, 2020, the department shall have one (1) year from July 1, 2020, either to issue a license, where proof already has been submitted, or to modify the permit to conform to the provisions of this section by establishing future reporting intervals for periodic proof statements, by establishing the date for the final proof statement corresponding with the end of the planning horizon authorized by the existing permit, and by updating approval conditions to clarify whether information that must be submitted with proof of beneficial use is due at each reporting interval or only with the final proof statement.

Any permit holder aggrieved by the decision of the department of water resources regarding its request for extension may request a hearing before the director in accordance with section 42-1701A(3), Idaho Code, for the purpose of contesting the decision and may seek judicial review pursuant to section 42-1701A(4), Idaho Code, of any final decision of the director following the hearing.

(b) The time for completion of works and application of the water to full beneficial use under any permit involving the diversion of more than twenty-five thousand (25,000) acre-feet in one (1) irrigation season for a project of no less than five thousand (5,000) acres may, upon application to the director of the department of water resources supported by a showing that additional time is needed on account of the time required for organizing, financing and constructing works of such large size, be extended by the director of the department of water resources for up to twelve (12) years beyond the initial development deadline contained in the permit, or beyond a grant of extension pursuant to the provisions of paragraph (a) of this subsection: Provided, that no such extension shall be granted unless the permit holder for such extension shall show that there has been actually expended toward the construction of said diversion, including expenditures for the purchase of rights-of-way and property in connection therewith, at least one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000).

(c) The time for completion of works and application of the water to full beneficial use under any permit involving the construction of a reservoir of more than ten thousand (10,000) acre-feet capacity or for the appropriation of water to be impounded in such reservoir of more than ten thousand (10,000) acre-feet capacity may be extended by the director of the department of water resources upon application to the director if the permit holder establishes that the permit holder has exercised reasonable diligence and that good cause exists for the requested extension.

(d) The time for completion of works and application of the water to full beneficial use under any permit involving the diversion of two (2) or more cubic feet per second or the development or cultivation of one hundred (100) or more acres of land may be extended by the director of the department of water resources upon application by the permit holder for an additional period up to ten (10) years beyond the initial development deadline contained in the permit, or beyond a grant of extension pursuant to the provisions of paragraph (a) of this subsection, provided the permit holder establishes that the permit holder has exercised reasonable diligence and that good cause exists for the requested extension.

(e) In connection with permits held by the United States, or the Idaho water resource board, whether acquired as the original applicant by assignment or otherwise, the director of the department of water resources may extend the time for completion of the works and application of the water to full beneficial use for such additional period or periods of time as the director may deem necessary upon an extension request supported by a showing that such additional time is required by reason of the status of plans, authorization, construction fund appropriations, construction, or any arrangements that are found to be requisite to completion of the construction of such works.

(f) In all other situations not governed by these provisions, the department may grant one (1) extension of time, not exceeding five (5) years beyond the date originally set for completion of works and application of the water to full beneficial use, or beyond any grant of extension pursuant to the provisions of paragraph (a) of this subsection, upon request for extension received on or before the date set for completion, provided good cause appears therefor.

§ 42-205. Issuance of permit — Restrictions — Preference.

No permit shall be issued by the department of water resources of the state of Idaho, for the appropriation of water for power purposes, nor shall any such permit be assigned, transferred, mortgaged, sold or conveyed to any person, firm or corporation except in accordance with the provisions of this act.

Water cannot be appropriated for hydropower development uses within or using existing man-made irrigation facilities without the permission of the owner thereof.

When competing applications for a permit have been filed prior to the effective date of this act for the additional use for hydropower purposes that would utilize facilities that are owned or controlled by the holder of an existing water permit, license, decree, or established constitutional water usage, the director shall give preference to the application of the owner of the existing rights or his agent.

§ 42-206. Residence a requisite for issuance.

No permit to appropriate water for power purposes in the state of Idaho shall hereafter be granted to any person or association of persons not an actual bona fide resident or residents of the state of Idaho, nor to any corporation or partnership unless organized or qualified to do business in and under the laws of the state of Idaho.

§ 42-207. Sale, transfer, assignment or mortgage of permit.

Whenever the holder of a permit to appropriate water for power purposes within the state of Idaho, desires to sell, assign, transfer or mortgage such permit so held by him, he shall file with the director of the department of water resources a copy of the deed, bill of sale, assignment, mortgage or other document of transfer, together with such proof as the director of the department of water resources may require that the new owner, holder or assignee of such permit, or the mortgagee, or one or more of the trustees under any mortgage trust indenture, possesses the qualifications set forth in section 42-206[, Idaho Code], and that such transfer is made in good faith, and not for purposes of speculation or delay; and the sale, transfer, assignment or mortgaging of any such permit except as herein provided shall be void, it being the express intention of the legislature to prohibit the transfer of permits to appropriate water for power purposes by mortgaging the same or otherwise, except in accordance with the provisions of this act.

§ 42-208. Cancellation or revocation for noncompliance.

Every permit to appropriate water for power purposes hereafter issued by the director of the department of water resources shall have plainly printed thereon, that the same is issued subject to the provisions of this act and in the event of its sale, transfer, assignment or of its being mortgaged without a compliance with the provisions of this act, such permit shall be immediately canceled and revoked by the director of the department of water resources.

§ 42-209. Effect of illegal transfer.

Every permit to appropriate water for power purposes that shall be sold, transferred, assigned or mortgaged in violation of the provisions of this act shall be immediately canceled, and the transfer thereof shall not be binding on the state of Idaho.

§ 42-210. Application of act.

The provisions of this act shall not apply to any municipal corporations within the state.

§ 42-211. Amended application or permit — Appeals.

Whenever a permit has been issued pursuant to the provisions of this act, and the permit holder desires to change the place, period, or nature of the intended use, or make other substantial changes in the method of diversion or proposed use or uses of the water, he shall file an application for amendment upon forms to be furnished by the department of water resources together with the statutory fee for filing and recording same, and upon receipt thereof it shall be the duty of the department of water resources to examine same and if approval thereof would not result in the diversion and use of more water than originally permitted and if the rights of others will not be adversely affected thereby, the director of the department of water resources shall approve said application and return an approved copy to the permit holder. The director of the department of water resources shall give such notice to other affected water users as he deems appropriate and may grant the amendment, in whole or in part or upon conditions, or may deny same. Notice of partial approval or conditions or denial of an amendment shall be forwarded to the applicant by certified mail and shall be subject to judicial review as hereafter provided. The priority of the right established pursuant to a permit which has been amended under these provisions shall date from the date of the original application for permit, provided the permit holder has complied with other provisions of this act.

In connection with any application on which permit has not been issued, amendments may be made by indorsement by the applicant or his agent on the original application, which indorsement shall be initialed and dated. If the amendment will result in the use of more water than originally asked, the priority of the right shall be changed to the date of said amendment. The applicant shall also be required to pay any additional filing fee as a result of an amendment of the rate of diversion or volume of storage requested in such amended application. If amendment is made after publication of notice of the original application, said notice shall be republished following amendment, upon payment by the applicant of the statutory fee for republication as in this act provided.

The notice shall be published in the same manner as provided by section 42-203 [42-203A], Idaho Code, for publication of notice of an application for permit. Protests to the application for amendment may be filed with and heard by the director in the same manner as provided by section 42-203 [42-203A], Idaho Code, for protests to an application for a permit.

If a protest is filed and a hearing on the protest held, any person aggrieved by the final decision of the director following the hearing may seek judicial review thereof pursuant to section 42-1701A(4), Idaho Code.

§ 42-212. Diversion of private waters.

The department of water resources is hereby prohibited from issuing or granting permits to divert or appropriate the waters of any lake not exceeding five (5) acres in surface area at highwater mark, pond, pool or spring in this state, which is located or situated wholly or entirely upon the lands of a person or corporation, except to the person or corporation owning said land, or with his or its written permission, executed and acknowledged as required for the conveyance of real estate.

§ 42-213. Diversion of private waters — Applicants must show right of way.

All applications to the department of water resources for permits to divert or appropriate the waters of any lake, pond, pool or spring shall state whether such lake, pond, pool or spring is wholly or entirely upon the land of any person or corporation other than the applicant, and, in the event that it is, such application shall state that the applicant has the written permission from such owner, executed and acknowledged as required by the provisions of the preceding section to divert or appropriate such water.

§ 42-214 — 42-216. Proof of completion — Department of reclamation to report on work — Issuance of certificate — Appeal from department’s decision. [Repealed.]

§ 42-217. Proof of application to beneficial use.

On or before the date set for the beneficial use of waters appropriated under the provisions of this chapter, or the date set for submission of an incremental statement of completion showing proof of beneficial use, the permit holder shall submit a statement on a form furnished by the department of water resources that the permit holder has used such water for the beneficial purpose allowed by the permit. The statement shall include:

The name and post office address of the permit holder;

The permit number;

A description of the extent of the use;

In the case of a municipal provider, a description of the current service area;

The source of the water used; and

Such other information as shall be required by the department’s form.

Such written statement shall include fees as provided in subsection K. of section 42-221, Idaho Code, or a field examination report prepared by a certified water right examiner. For permits held by a municipal provider for reasonably anticipated future needs, such statements shall be provided in accordance with section 42-204(4), Idaho Code.

Upon receipt of such written statement and the fee as required in section 42-221, Idaho Code, the department shall examine, or cause to be examined:

The place where such water is diverted and used and, if the use is for irrigation, the area and location of the land irrigated and the nature of all the improvements which have been made as a direct result of such use.

The capacities of the ditches or canals or other means by which such water is conducted to such place of use and the quantity of water that has been beneficially applied for irrigation or other purposes.

The department or the person making such examination under the direction of the department shall prepare and file a report of the investigation: provided, that whenever an irrigation project is developed in the name of an association, company, corporation, irrigation district or the United States as provided in section 42-219, Idaho Code, proof of beneficial use shall be made by the permit holder. The lands upon which the water has been used need not be described by legal subdivisions, but may be described as provided in section 42-219, Idaho Code, and it shall only be necessary to show in such cases that the quantity of water beneficially applied for irrigation has been applied within the limits of the project.

§ 42-217a. Certified water right examiner.

The director shall adopt all necessary rules and regulations setting forth the procedures and requirements for qualification of licensed professional engineers or geologists to become certified water right examiners.

An initial application fee of two hundred dollars ($200) shall be paid by those applying for certification with an annual renewal fee of fifty dollars ($50.00). All certificates of appointment shall expire on March 31 of each year and thereafter are void unless renewed. The fees collected shall be transmitted to the state treasurer for deposit in the water administration account.

Employees of the department shall be exempt from the requirements of this section.

§ 42-218. Proof of application to beneficial use — Extension of time.

Whenever a less period of time than the maximum prescribed in section 42-204[, Idaho Code,] has been granted by the department of water resources for making proof of beneficial use, upon a satisfactory showing being made by the permit holder, the department can extend the time for making such proof of beneficial use, but in no case shall such extension or extensions, including the original time granted, exceed the maximum prescribed in section 42-204[, Idaho Code]. The department shall grant no extension unless the application therefor be filed with it prior to the date upon which the proof of beneficial use was required to be made under the original terms of the permit.

§ 42-218a. Lapse of application for failure to request extension or submit proof of application to beneficial use — Notice of lapsing.

A permit upon which the proof of beneficial use, or an incremental statement of completion showing proof of beneficial use, has not been submitted, or a request for extension of time has not been received on or before the date set for such proof or incremental statement, shall lapse and be of no further force nor effect. For a permit held by a municipal provider for reasonably anticipated future needs, such lapse shall not apply to any portion of the permit that has been previously licensed or for which an incremental statement of completion showing proof of beneficial use has been submitted. Notice of said lapsing shall be sent by the department to the permit holder at the address of record by regular mail.

Within sixty (60) days after such notice of lapsing, the department may, upon a showing of reasonable cause, reinstate the permit with the priority date advanced a time equal to the number of days that said showing is subsequent to the date set for proof.

In connection with a proof of beneficial use statement submitted more than sixty (60) days after such notice of lapsing, the director shall require all of the following items to be submitted to the department:

A report prepared by a certified water right examiner as the result of an examination to clearly confirm and establish the extent of the beneficial use of water established in connection with the permit during the time authorized by the permit and any extensions of time previously approved. The report shall be on the form or forms specified by the director and shall provide the information specified in section 42-217, Idaho Code, for confirming beneficial use and such other information as may be required by the director.

A statement of reasonable cause for filing a late proof of beneficial use.

A reinstatement fee of two hundred fifty dollars ($250).

The original priority date of a lapsed permit shall not be reinstated except upon a showing of error or mistake of the department.

Upon finding that beneficial use had occurred during the authorized period and upon a showing of reasonable cause for filing a late proof of beneficial use, the director may reinstate the permit with the priority date advanced to the day that proof of beneficial use was received.

§ 42-219. Issuance of license — Priority.

Upon receipt by the department of water resources of all the evidence in relation to such final proof, it shall be the duty of the department to carefully examine the same, and if the department is satisfied that the law has been fully complied with and that the water is being used at the place claimed and for the purpose for which it was originally intended, the department shall issue to such user or users a license corresponding to the beneficial use. Such license shall state the name and post office address of such user, the purpose for which such water is used and the quantity of water that may be used, which in no case shall be an amount in excess of the amount that has been beneficially applied. For permits held by a municipal provider for reasonably anticipated future needs, a license may be issued incrementally for an amount corresponding to the beneficial use demonstrated to the satisfaction of the department in each incremental statement of completion showing proof of beneficial use submitted pursuant to section 42-204(4), Idaho Code, which amount, together with any previously licensed portion of said permit, shall not exceed the initial quantity authorized under the permit. The final incremental license at the end of the planning horizon shall be issued for an amount corresponding to the beneficial use. The director shall condition the license to prohibit any transfer of the place of use outside the service area, as defined in section 42-202B, Idaho Code, or to a new nature of use of amounts held for reasonably anticipated future needs together with such other conditions as the director may deem appropriate.

If such use is for irrigation, such license shall give a description, by legal subdivisions, of the land irrigated by such water, except that the general description of a place of use described in accordance with subsection (5) or (6) of this section may be described using a digital boundary, as defined in section 42-202B, Idaho Code. If the use is for municipal purposes, the license shall describe the service area as provided in section 42-202B(9), Idaho Code.

Such license shall bear the date of the application for, and the number of, the permit under which the works from which such water is taken were constructed, the date when proof of beneficial use of such water was made, and also the date of the priority of the right confirmed by such license.

The date of priority confirmed by the license shall be the date of the application for the permit for the construction of the works from which the water is taken, and to which the right relates, provided there has been no loss of priority under the provisions of this chapter. Whenever proof of the beneficial application of water shall be offered subsequent to the date stated in the permit, or in any authorized extension thereof, when such beneficial application shall be made, the proof shall be taken, if received by the department within the sixty (60) days prescribed in the preceding section. If the proof taken is satisfactory to the department of water resources, a license shall be issued by the department the same as though proof had been made before the date fixed for such beneficial application. The priority of the right established by the proof shall not date back to the date of the application for the permit to which the right would relate under the provisions of this chapter, but shall bear a date subsequent to the date of the application, a time equal to the difference between the date set in the permit, or extension thereof, for such beneficial application of water and the date of proof.
(5) For irrigation projects where the canals constructed cover an area of twenty-five thousand (25,000) acres or more, or within irrigation districts organized and existing as such under the laws of the state of Idaho, the license issued shall be issued to the persons, association, company, corporation or irrigation district owning the project, and final proof may be made by such owners for the benefit of the entire project. It shall not be necessary to give a description of the land by legal subdivisions, but a general description of the entire area under the canal system shall be sufficient. The water diverted and the water right acquired thereby shall relate to the entire project, and the diversion of the water for the beneficial use under the project shall be sufficient proof of beneficial use without regard as to whether each and every acre under the project is irrigated or not.

(6) For an irrigation project developed under a permit held by an association, company, corporation or the United States to divert and deliver or distribute surface water under any annual charge or rental for beneficial use by more than five (5) water users in an area of less than twenty-five thousand (25,000) acres, the license issued shall be issued to the permit holder. For the place of use description in the license issued for the irrigation project, it shall be sufficient to provide a general description of the area within which the total number of acres developed under the permit are located and within which the location of the licensed acreage can be moved provided there is no injury to other water rights.

(7) Subject to other governing law, the location of the acreage irrigated within a generally described place of use, as defined in accordance with subsections (5) and (6) of this section and as filed with the department pursuant to section 43-323, Idaho Code, may be changed without approval under the provisions of section 42-222, Idaho Code. However, the change shall not result in an increase in either the rate of flow diverted or in the total number of acres irrigated under the water right and shall cause no injury to other water rights. If the holder of any water right seeks to challenge such a change, the challenge may be brought only as an action initiating a contested case before the department, pursuant to the administrative procedure act, chapter 52, title 67, Idaho Code. Nothing in this section shall be construed to grant, deny or otherwise affect an irrigation district’s authority to deliver water to areas outside the boundaries of such district.

(8) In the event that the department shall find that the applicant has not fully complied with the law and the conditions of permit, it may issue a license for that portion of the use that is in accordance with the permit or may refuse issuance of a license and void the permit. Notice of such action shall be forwarded to the permit holder by certified mail. The applicant may contest such action by the department pursuant to section 42-1701A(3), Idaho Code.

§ 42-220. Effect of license.

Water right licenses shall be binding upon the state as to the right of such licensee to use the amount of water mentioned therein and shall be prima facie evidence as to such right; and all rights to water confirmed under the provisions of this chapter, or by any decree of court, shall become appurtenant to, and shall pass with a conveyance of, the land for which the right of use is granted. The right to continue the beneficial use of such waters shall never be denied nor prevented for any cause other than the failure, on the part of the user or holder of such right, to pay the ordinary charges or assessments which may be made or levied to cover the expenses for the delivery or distribution of such water, or for other reasons set forth in this title: provided, that when water is used for irrigation, no such license or decree of the court allotting such water shall be issued confirming the right to the use of more than one (1) second foot of water for each fifty (50) acres of land so irrigated, unless it can be shown to the satisfaction of the department of water resources in granting such license, and to the court in making such decree, that a greater amount is necessary, and neither such licensee nor anyone claiming a right under such decree, shall at any time be entitled to the use of more water than can be beneficially applied on the lands for the benefit of which such right may have been confirmed, and the right to the use of such water confirmed by such license shall always be held subject to the local or community customs, rules and regulations which may be adopted from time to time by a majority of the users from a common source of supply, canal or lateral from which such water may be taken, when such rules or regulations have for their object the economical use of such water.